New York, session 2025-2026, A10886.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The election law is amended by adding a new section 14-131 2 to read as follows: 3 § 14-131. Use of campaign funds for security expenses. 1. Contrib- 4 utions received by a candidate or a political committee may be expended 5 for any security expense incurred to address ongoing dangers and threats 6 to such candidate, the campaign staff for such candidate, or the candi- 7 date's immediate family related to the status or activities as a candi- 8 date for elective office or holder of elective office. 9 2. Security expenses authorized pursuant to this section shall not: 10 (a) be paid from public matching funds provided pursuant to title two 11 of this article; 12 (b) be used to purchase firearms or ammunition; or 13 (c) be directed to any family member of a candidate or office holder 14 or entity owned or controlled by such candidate or office holder or 15 family member thereof. 16 3. Any candidate or office holder may determine that the security 17 expense is reasonable and shall not require a finding or evidence of a 18 specific danger or threat or verification by law enforcement. 19 4. Any security expense incurred pursuant to this section shall be 20 included in the statements required to be filed pursuant to this arti- 21 cle. 22 5. The state board of elections may issue advisory opinions upon 23 request regarding the eligibility of use of contributions for security 24 expenditures. 25 6. As used in this section: 26 (a) "Security expense" means any purchase, installation, maintenance, 27 and upgrade of security measures, including but not limited to: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15421-01-6 A. 10886 2 1 (i) non-structural security devices, such as security hardware, locks, 2 alarm systems, motion detectors, and security camera systems; 3 (ii) structural security devices, such as wiring, lighting, gates, 4 doors, and fencing intended solely to provide security; security person- 5 nel and services that are bona fide, legitimate, and professional; 6 (iii) cybersecurity software, devices, and services; and 7 (iv) monitoring and other services, including maintenance, directly 8 associated with such non-structural and structural security devices. 9 (b) "Immediate family" means a spouse, registered domestic partner, or 10 any minor child residing in the household of the candidate or office 11 holder. 12 7. The state board of elections is authorized to promulgate any rules 13 or regulations necessary to implement this section. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 15 have become a law.